Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 314.011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context thereof requires otherwise:
(1) "Board" means Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(2) "Delegation" means directing a competent person to perform a selected nursing
activity or task in a selected situation under the nurse's supervision and pursuant to
administrative regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 13A;
(3) "Nurse" means a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under the
provisions of this chapter as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse;
(4) "Nursing process" means the investigative approach to nursing practice utilizing a
method of problem-solving by means of:
(a) Nursing diagnosis, a systematic investigation of a health concern, and an
analysis of the data collected in order to arrive at an identifiable problem; and
(b) Planning, implementation, and evaluation based on nationally accepted
standards of nursing practice;
(5) "Registered nurse" means one who is licensed or holds the privilege under the
provisions of this chapter to engage in registered nursing practice;
(6) "Registered nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring substantial
specialized knowledge, judgment, and nursing skill based upon the principles of
psychological, biological, physical, and social sciences in the application of the
nursing process in:
(a) The care, counsel, and health teaching of the ill, injured, or infirm;
(b) The maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;
(c) The administration of medication and treatment as prescribed by a physician,
physician assistant, dentist, or advanced practice registered nurse and as
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
further authorized or limited by the board, and which are consistent either
with American Nurses' Association Scope and Standards of Practice or with
standards of practice established by nationally accepted organizations of
registered nurses. Components of medication administration include but are
not limited to:
1. Preparing and giving medications in the prescribed dosage, route, and
frequency, including dispensing medications only as defined in
subsection (17)(a)[(b)] of this section;
2. Observing, recording, and reporting desired effects, untoward reactions,
and side effects of drug therapy;
3. Intervening when emergency care is required as a result of drug therapy;
4. Recognizing accepted prescribing limits and reporting deviations to the
prescribing individual;
5. Recognizing drug incompatibilities and reporting interactions or
potential interactions to the prescribing individual; and
6. Instructing an individual regarding medications;
(d) The supervision, teaching of, and delegation to other personnel in the
performance of activities relating to nursing care; and
(e) The performance of other nursing acts which are authorized or limited by the
board, and which are consistent either with American Nurses' Association
Standards of Practice or with Standards of Practice established by nationally
accepted organizations of registered nurses;
(7) "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a certified nurse
practitioner, certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified nurse midwife, or
clinical nurse specialist, who is licensed to engage in advance practice registered
nursing pursuant to KRS 314.042 and certified in at least one (1) population focus;
(8) "Advanced practice registered nursing" means the performance of additional acts by
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
registered nurses who have gained advanced clinical knowledge and skills through
an accredited education program that prepares the registered nurse for one (1) of the
four (4) APRN roles; who are certified by the American Nurses' Association or
other nationally established organizations or agencies recognized by the board to
certify registered nurses for advanced practice registered nursing as a certified nurse
practitioner, certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified nurse midwife, or
clinical nurse specialist; and who certified in at least one (1) population focus. The
additional acts shall, subject to approval of the board, include but not be limited to
prescribing treatment, drugs, devices, and ordering diagnostic tests. Advanced
practice registered nurses who engage in these additional acts shall be authorized to
issue prescriptions for and dispense, as defined in KRS 315.010, nonscheduled
legend drugs, as defined in KRS 217.905, and to issue prescriptions for but not to
dispense Schedules II through V controlled substances described in or as classified
pursuant to KRS 218A.020, 218A.060, 218A.080, 218A.100, and 218A.120 under
the conditions set forth in KRS 314.042 and regulations promulgated by the
Kentucky Board of Nursing on or before August 15, 2006.
(a) 1. Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for Schedule
II controlled substances classified under KRS 218A.060, except
hydrocodone combination products as defined in KRS 218A.010, shall
be limited to a seventy-two (72) hour supply without any refill.
2. Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for
hydrocodone combination products as defined in KRS 218A.010 shall
be limited to a thirty (30) day supply without any refill.
3. Prescriptions issued under this subsection for psychostimulants may be
written for a thirty (30) day supply only by an advanced practice
registered nurse certified in psychiatric-mental health nursing who is
providing services in a health facility as defined in KRS Chapter 216B
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
or in a regional services program for mental health or individuals with
an intellectual disability as defined in KRS Chapter 210.
(b) Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for Schedule III
controlled substances classified under KRS 218A.080 shall be limited to a
thirty (30) day supply without any refill. Prescriptions issued by advanced
practice registered nurses for Schedules IV and V controlled substances
classified under KRS 218A.100 and 218A.120 shall be limited to the original
prescription and refills not to exceed a six (6) month supply.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring an advanced practice
registered nurse designated by the board as a certified registered nurse anesthetist to
obtain prescriptive authority pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of law
in order to deliver anesthesia care. The performance of these additional acts shall be
consistent with the certifying organization or agencies' scopes and standards of
practice recognized by the board by administrative regulation;
(9) "Licensed practical nurse" means one who is licensed or holds the privilege under
the provisions of this chapter to engage in licensed practical nursing practice;
(10) "Licensed practical nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring
knowledge and skill such as are taught or acquired in approved schools for practical
nursing in:
(a) The observing and caring for the ill, injured, or infirm under the direction of a
registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant,
licensed physician, or dentist;
(b) The giving of counsel and applying procedures to safeguard life and health, as
defined and authorized by the board;
(c) The administration of medication or treatment as authorized by a physician,
physician assistant, dentist, or advanced practice registered nurse and as
further authorized or limited by the board which is consistent with the
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
National Federation of Licensed Practical Nurses or with Standards of
Practice established by nationally accepted organizations of licensed practical
nurses;
(d) Teaching, supervising, and delegating except as limited by the board; and
(e) The performance of other nursing acts which are authorized or limited by the
board and which are consistent with the National Federation of Practical
Nurses' Standards of Practice or with Standards of Practice established by
nationally accepted organizations of licensed practical nurses;
(11) "School of nursing" means a nursing education program preparing persons for
licensure as a registered nurse or a practical nurse;
(12) "Continuing education" means offerings beyond the basic nursing program that
present specific content planned and evaluated to meet competency based
behavioral objectives which develop new skills and upgrade knowledge;
(13) "Nursing assistance" means the performance of delegated nursing acts by
unlicensed nursing personnel for compensation under supervision of a nurse;
(14) "Sexual assault nurse examiner" means a registered nurse who has completed the
required education and clinical experience and maintains a current credential from
the board as provided under KRS 314.142 to conduct forensic examinations of
victims of sexual offenses under the medical protocol issued by the Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet in consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team
Advisory Committee pursuant to KRS 216B.400(5);
(15) "Competency" means the application of knowledge and skills in the utilization of
critical thinking, effective communication, interventions, and caring behaviors
consistent with the nurse's practice role within the context of the public's health,
safety, and welfare;
(16) "Credential" means a current license, registration, certificate, or other similar
authorization that is issued by the board;
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
(17) "Dispense" or "dispensing" means:
(a) If appropriately prescribed by a physician, physician assistant, dentist, or
advanced practice registered nurse:
1. To receive and distribute nonscheduled legend drug samples from
pharmaceutical manufacturers to patients at no charge to the patient or
any other party; or
2.[(b)] To distribute nonscheduled legend drugs from a local, district, and
independent health department, subject to the direction of the
appropriate governing board of the individual health department; and
(b) For an advanced practice registered nurse who is authorized to dispense
nonscheduled legend drugs, the same as in KRS 315.010.
(18) "Dialysis care" means a process by which dissolved substances are removed from a
patient's body by diffusion, osmosis, and convection from one (1) fluid
compartment to another across a semipermeable membrane;
(19) "Dialysis technician" means a person who is not a nurse, a physician assistant, or a
physician and who provides dialysis care in a licensed renal dialysis facility under
the direct, on-site supervision of a registered nurse or a physician;
(20) "Population focus" means the section of the population within which the advanced
practice registered nurse has targeted to practice. The categories of population foci
are:
(a) Family and individual across the lifespan;
(b) Adult gerontology;
(c) Neonatal;
(d) Pediatrics;
(e) Women's health and gender-related health; and
(f) Psychiatric mental health; and
(21) "Conviction" means but is not limited to:
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1234
(a) An unvacated adjudication of guilt;
(b) Pleading no contest or nolo contendere or entering an Alford plea; or
(c) Entering a guilty plea pursuant to a pretrial diversion order;
Regardless of whether the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 12/10/2025 1:49 PM Jacketed